West Virginia, session 2026, SB1052.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 7. COUNTY COMMISSIONS AND OFFICERS. ARTICLE 1. COUNTY COMMISSIONS AND OFFICERS §7-1-17. Approval of volunteer fire department purchases using fire fee levy monies. A county commission shall, effective July 1, 2026, allow or disallow, at its discretion, any use of fire fee levy monies by volunteer fire departments for purchases in excess of $10,000: Provided, That all purchases in excess of $10,000 by volunteer fire departments using monies provided by a county fire board from a fire fee levy must submit such purchase to the county fire board for approval before effecting purchase.